Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 2.16, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2. Departments The governor, except in the year of the governorâs initial inauguration, and the departments and agencies of state government shall, at least forty-five sixty days prior to the convening of each session of the general assembly, submit copies to the legislative services agency of proposed legislative bills and joint resolutions which that the governor and such departments and agencies desire to be considered by the general assembly. The proposed legislative bills and joint resolutions of the governor must be submitted by the Friday prior to the convening of the session of the general assembly, except in the year of the governorâs initial inauguration. The legislative services agency shall review such proposals and submit them in proper form to the presiding officer in each house of the general assembly for referral to the proper standing committee. Before submitting any proposal prepared under this section to the presiding officers, the legislative services agency shall return it for review to, as appropriate, the relevant department or agency or Senate File 2207, p. 2 the governorâs office and such department or agency or the governorâs office shall review and return it within seven days of such delivery. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2207, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor